District of Columbia statutes.
25-823

Prompt notice of investigative reports.

(a)

The Board may fine, as set forth in the schedule of civil penalties established under § 25-830, and suspend, or revoke the license of any licensee during the license period if:

(1)

The licensee violates any of the provisions of this title, the regulations promulgated under this title, or any other laws of the District, including the District’s curfew law;

(2)

The licensee allows the licensed establishment to be used for any unlawful or disorderly purpose;

(3)

The licensee fails to superintend in person, or through a manager approved by the Board, the business for which the license was issued;

(4)

The licensee allows its employees or agents to engage in prostitution, as defined under § 22-2701.01(1) [now § 22-2701.01(3)], or engage in sexual acts or sexual contact, as defined under § 22-3001, at the licensed establishment;

(5)

The licensee fails or refuses to allow an ABRA investigator, a designated agent of ABRA, or a member of the Metropolitan Police Department to enter or inspect without delay the licensed premises or examine the books and records of the business, or otherwise interferes with an investigation;

(6)

The licensee fails to follow its settlement agreement, security plan, or Board order;

(7)

The licensee fails to follow the terms of its license approved by the Board; or

(8)

The licensee fails to preserve a crime scene.

(b)

A single incident of assault, sexual assault, or violence shall be sufficient to prove a violation of subsection (a)(2) of this section; provided, that the licensee has engaged in a method of operation that is conducive to unlawful or disorderly conduct.

(c)

A licensee shall be required to comply with the terms and conditions of the licensee’s settlement agreement, security plan, or order from the Board that is attached to the license during all times that it is in operation. A single violation of a settlement agreement, security plan, or order from the Board shall be sufficient to prove a violation of subsection (a)(6) of this section.

History

Jan. 24, 1934, 48 Stat. 330, ch. 4, § 17
Aug. 27, 1935, 49 Stat. 900, ch. 756, § 9
Aug. 25, 1937, 50 Stat. 803, ch. 766, § 3
Apr. 26, 1950, 64 Stat. 88, ch. 106
Dec. 8, 1970, 84 Stat. 1393, Pub. L. 91-535, § 3(a)
Sept. 29, 1982, D.C. Law 4-157, §§ 9, 15, 29 DCR 3617
Mar. 8, 1984, D.C. Law 5-51, § 2(b)(5), 30 DCR 5927
Mar. 7, 1987, D.C. Law 6-217, § 11, 34 DCR 907
Sept. 11, 1993, D.C. Law 10-12, § 2(b), 40 DCR 4020
May 24, 1994, D.C. Law 10-122, § 2(h), 41 DCR 1658
Apr. 30, 1998, D.C. Law 12-97, § 2, 45 DCR 1517
May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959
Mar. 13, 2004, D.C. Law 15-105, § 4, 51 DCR 881
Sept. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-187, § 101(ee), 51 DCR 6525
July 18, 2008, D.C. Law 17-201, § 6(a), 55 DCR 6289
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-361, § 2(d)(2), 56 DCR 1204
May 1, 2013, D.C. Law 19-310, § 2(ee), 60 DCR 3410
May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-270, § 2(f)(2), 62 DCR 1866

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 25-823.
1973 Ed., § 25-118.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-105, in par. (1), substituted “of the District” for “if the District”.
D.C. Law 15-187, in pars. (2) and (3), made nonsubstantive changes; and added par. (4).
D.C. Law 17-201, in the lead-in text, substituted “may fine, as set forth in the schedule of civil penalties established under § 25-830, suspend,” for “may suspend”; in par. (1), substituted “laws of the District, including the District’s curfew law” for “laws of the District”; in par. (3), deleted “or” from the end; in par. (4), substituted a semicolon for a period at the end; and added pars. (5) and (6).
D.C. Law 17-361, in the lead-in language, substituted “and suspend” for “suspend”.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-310 substituted “settlement agreement” for “voluntary agreement” in (6).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-270 designated the existing text as (a); added (a)(7) and (a)(8) and made related changes; and added (b) and (c).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of (6), see § 2(ee) of the Omnibus Alcoholic Beverage Regulation Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-597, January 14, 2013, 60 DCR 1001).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(ee) of the Omnibus Alcoholic Beverage Regulation Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-52, April 22, 2013, 60 DCR 6372, 20 DCSTAT 1388).